New Jersey, session 222, S1147.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this act, Eligible district means a public school district that owns and operates its own school buses and does not use a school bus contractor for the provision of student transportation services. b.  An individual may apply for employment as a school bus driver with an eligible district and shall be reimbursed by the Department of Education for the cost of obtaining a commercial driver license and all required endorsements, provided that: (1) the individual maintains a commercial driver license with all required endorsements during the period of employment with the eligible district; (2) the individual completes all training required for school bus drivers pursuant to State and federal law; and (3) the individual commits to five years of employment as a school bus driver in the eligible district. c.  An individual that receives reimbursement from the department pursuant to subsection b. of this section, who does not complete five years of employment as a school bus driver with an eligible district, shall repay to the department the total cost of obtaining a commercial driver license and all required endorsements, prorated against the duration of employment as a school bus driver in an eligible district as follows: (1)  an individual who is employed as a school bus driver for three years or less shall repay 100 percent of the total cost of obtaining a commercial driver license and all required endorsements; and (2) an individual who is employed as a school bus driver for four years shall repay 50 percent of the total cost of obtaining a commercial driver license and all required endorsements. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.